District of Columbia statutes.
34-2133

Potomac interceptor — Appropriations.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter, there is authorized to be appropriated, without fiscal year limitation, the sum of $3,000,000, as the federal contribution toward the cost of planning, acquiring rights-of-way for, and constructing the Potomac interceptor.

History

June 12, 1960, 74 Stat. 210, Pub. L. 86-515, § 3
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, § 4(c), 22 DCR 6316

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-2132.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1623.
1973 Ed., § 43-1622.